Wyoming, session 2026, SF0097.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-30-101 is created to read:

CHAPTER 30
GOVERNMENT ENTITIES PAYMENTS AND TRANSACTIONS

9-30-101. Payments to government entities.

SF0097

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0433
(a) In addition to other forms of payment accepted at
the discretion of the government entity, a government
entity shall accept cash for any in-person transaction as a
form of payment for:

(i) Any fee, fine, tax or charge imposed by a
government entity;

(ii) Any payment made for or in relation to
admission to any event sponsored by the government entity.

(b) No government entity shall charge an additional
fee solely because a person made a cash payment. This
subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a government
entity from collecting fees otherwise authorized by law
regardless of payment method.

(c) For the purposes of this section, "government
entity" shall mean the state, its agencies, municipalities,
counties, school districts, public colleges and
universities, political subdivisions and special districts.

SF0097

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0433
(d) For the purposes of this section, "cash" shall
mean physical coins produced by the United States mint and
notes governed by the federal reserve and produced by the
United States bureau of engraving and printing.

Section 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
modify or impair existing contracts or obligations
regarding payment.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0097